sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za radiatorje: Ključi za odzračevanje radiatorjev; Pokrovi za radiatorje; Vlažilniki za radiatorje; Reflektorji za radiatorje; Police za radiatorje; Ventili za radiatorje
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Fűtőradiátor-kiegészítők: Fűtésradiátor légtelenítő kulcsok; Radiátorburkolatok; Fűtésradiátor párásítók; Fűtőradiátor-reflektorok; Radiátorpolcok; Radiátorszelepek
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 輻射式電暖爐配件: 加熱散熱器排氣鑰匙; 加熱散熱器罩; 加熱散熱器加濕器; 輻射式電暖爐反射器; 加熱散熱器置物架; 加熱散熱器閥門
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องนำความร้อน: กุญแจไล่ลมหม้อน้ำนำความร้อน; ฝาครอบหม้อน้ำนำความร้อน; เครื่องทำความชื้นในหม้อน้ำนำความร้อน; ตัวสะท้อนเครื่องนำความร้อน; ชั้นวางหม้อน้ำนำความร้อน; วาล์วหม้อน้ำนำความร้อน
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 방열기 부대용품: 라디에이터 에어 배출 키; 난방 라디에이터 커버; 라디에이터 가습기; 방열기 반사판; 난방 라디에이터 선반; 난방 라디에이터 밸브
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Heizkörperzubehör: Entlüftungsschlüssel für Heizkörper; Heizkörperabdeckungen; Heizkörper-Luftbefeuchter; Heizkörperreflexionsfolie; Heizkörperablagen; Heizkörperventile
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Tillbehör till värmeelement: Luftningsnycklar för värmeelement; Elementskydd; Luftfuktare för värmeelement; Reflektorer för värmeelement; Elementhyllor; Elementventiler
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Šildymo radiatorių priedai: Šildymo radiatorių nuorinimo raktai; Šildymo radiatorių dangteliai; Šildymo radiatorių drėkintuvai; Šildymo radiatorių reflektoriai; Šildymo radiatorių lentynos; Šildymo radiatorių vožtuvai
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para radiadores de calefacción: Llaves de purgado de radiadores; Cubreradiadores; Humidificadores para radiadores; Reflectores para radiadores de calefacción; Repisas para radiadores; Válvulas para radiadores
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Heating Radiator Accessories: Heating Radiator Bleed Keys; Heating Radiator Covers; Heating Radiator Humidifiers; Heating Radiator Reflectors; Heating Radiator Shelves; Heating Radiator Valves
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do kaloryferów: Klucze do odpowietrzania grzejników; Osłony na grzejniki; Nawilżacze powietrza do grzejników; Folie odbijające ciepło; Półki na grzejniki; Zawory do grzejników
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de radiador de calor: Chaves de purga para radiador; Capas para radiador; Humidificadores para radiador; Refletores de radiador de calor; Prateleiras para radiador; Válvulas para radiador
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за отоплителни радиатори: Ключове за обезвъздушаване на радиатори за отопление; Покрития за радиатори за отопление; Овлажнители за радиатори за отопление; Рефлектори за радиатори за отопление; Рафтове за отоплителни радиатори; Клапани за отоплителни радиатори
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori per termosifoni: Chiavi di spurgo del radiatore di riscaldamento; Coperture per radiatori per riscaldamento; Umidificatori per radiatori di riscaldamento; Pannelli riflettenti per termosifoni; Mensole per radiatori per riscaldamento; Valvole per radiatori per riscaldamento
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo k radiátorom: Kľúče na odvzdušnenie radiátorov; Kryty na radiátory; Zvlhčovače vzduchu pre radiátory; Termoizolačné fólie za radiátory; Police na radiátory; Ventily radiátorov
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > オイルヒーター関連用品: 暖房用ラジエーターエア抜きキー; 暖房用ラジエーターカバー; 暖房用ラジエーター加湿器; オイルヒーター用反射板; 暖房用ラジエーターシェルフ; 暖房用ラジエーターバルブ
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Lämpöpattereiden lisätarvikkeet: Lämmityspatterien ilmausavaimet; Lämpöpatterin kotelot; Lämmityspatterien ilmankostuttimet; Lämpöpatterin heijastimet; Lämpöpatterin hyllyt; Lämpöpatterin venttiilit
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para aquecedores: Chaves de sangria para radiadores de aquecimento; Capas para radiadores de aquecimento; Umidificadores para radiadores de aquecimento; Refletores para aquecedores; Prateleiras para radiadores de aquecimento; Válvulas para radiadores de aquecimento
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện máy sưởi: Chìa Xả Khí Bộ Tản Nhiệt; Vỏ Bọc Bộ Tản Nhiệt; Máy Tạo Ẩm Bộ Tản Nhiệt; Gương phản xạ nhiệt cho máy sưởi; Kệ Để Trên Bộ Tản Nhiệt; Van Bộ Tản Nhiệt
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Kalorifer Aksesuarları: Radyatör Hava Alma Anahtarları; Radyatör Kapakları; Radyatör Nemlendiricileri; Kalorifer Yansıtıcı Panelleri; Radyatör Rafları; Radyatör Vanaları
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Topná tělesa – příslušenství: Klíče na odvzdušnění radiátorů; Kryty topných radiátorů; Zvlhčovače vzduchu pro radiátory; Reflexní fólie k topným tělesům; Poličky pro topné radiátory; Ventily topných radiátorů
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Accessoires voor radiators: Ontluchtingssleutels voor verwarmingsradiatoren; Radiatorombouwen; Radiatorbevochtigers; Radiatorreflectors; Radiatorplanken; Radiatorkranen
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za radijatore: Ključevi za odzračivanje radijatora; Zaštite za radijatore; Ovlaživači zraka za radijatore; Reflektori za radijatore; Police za radijatore; Ventili za radijatore
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til varmeradiatorer: Lufteknapper for varmeradiator; Radiatordeksler; Luftfuktere for varmeradiatorer; Reflektorer til varmeradiatorer; Radiatorhyller; Radiatorventiler
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour radiateurs: Clés de purge pour radiateurs; Caches pour radiateurs; Humidificateurs pour radiateurs; Réflecteurs pour radiateurs; Étagères pour radiateurs; Vannes de radiateurs
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 供暖散热片配件: 采暖散热器放气阀钥匙; 采暖散热器罩; 采暖散热器加湿器; 供暖散热片反射板; 采暖散热器置物架; 采暖散热器阀门
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для радиаторов отопления: Ключи для стравливания воздуха из радиатора отопления; Панели для радиаторов; Увлажнители для радиаторов отопления; Теплоотражающие решения для радиаторов отопления; Полки для радиаторов; Клапаны для радиаторов
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire: Chei pentru aerisirea radiatoarelor de încălzire; Panouri de mascare pentru calorifere; Umidificatoare cu radiatoare de încălzire; Panouri reflectorizante pentru radiatoare pentru încălzire; Rafturi pentru calorifere; Robineți pentru calorifere
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης: Κλειδιά εξαέρωσης καλοριφέρ; Καλύμματα καλοριφέρ; Υγραντήρες καλοριφέρ; Αντανακλαστικά καλοριφέρ θέρμανσης; Ράφια καλοριφέρ; Βαλβίδες καλοριφέρ
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Radiator – tilbehør: Udluftningsnøgler til radiatorer; Radiatorafdækninger; Luftfugtere til radiatorer; Radiator – reflektorer; Radiatorhylder; Radiatorventiler